North Carolina statutes. Chapter 121. Archives and History.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 121-1.
Short title.

This Article shall be known as the North Carolina Archives and History Act.

History.

1973, c. 476, s. 48.

Cross References.

As to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, see G.S. 143B-49 et seq.

As to the North Carolina Historical Commission, see G.S. 143B-62 et seq.

§ 121-2.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this Article:

“Agency” shall mean any State, county, or municipal office, department, division, board, commission or separate unit of government created or established by constitution or law.

“Commission” shall mean the North Carolina Historical Commission.

“Department” shall mean the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources of the State of North Carolina.

“Historic preservation” shall mean any activity reasonably related to the identification, research, conservation, protection, and restoration, maintenance, or operation of buildings, structures, objects, districts, areas, and sites significant in the history, architecture, archaeology, or culture of this State, its communities, or the nation.

“Historic property” or “historic properties” shall mean any building, structure, object, district, area, or site that is significant in the history, architecture, archaeology, or culture of this State, its communities, or the nation.

“North Carolina Museum of History” shall mean an establishment or establishments administered by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources as the official State museum of history for the collection, preservation, and exhibition of artifacts and other materials that have been determined by the Department or by the Commission to have sufficient historical or other cultural value to warrant retention as evidence of the history and culture of the State and its subdivisions.

“North Carolina State Archives” shall mean an establishment or establishments administered by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources as the State’s official repository for the preservation of those public records or other documentary materials that have been determined by the Department in accordance with rules, regulations, and standards of the Historical Commission to have sufficient historical or other value to warrant their continued preservation and have been accepted by the Department for preservation in its custody.

“Public record” or “public records” shall mean all documents, papers, letters, maps, books, photographs, films, sound recordings, magnetic or other tapes, electronic data processing records, artifacts, or other documentary material, regardless of physical form or characteristics, made or received pursuant to law or ordinance or in connection with the transaction of official business by any agency.

“Records center” or “records centers” shall mean an establishment or establishments administered by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources primarily for the economical housing, processing, servicing, microfilming or security of public records that must be retained for varying periods of time but which need not be retained in an agency’s office equipment and space.

“Secretary” shall mean the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources.

“State historic site” or “state historic sites” shall mean a property or properties acquired by the State and administered by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources because of its or their historical, archaeological, architectural, or cultural value in depicting the heritage of the State.

History.

1973, c. 476, s. 48; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), (t).

Cross References.

As to official records of inoperative boards and agencies, see

G.S. 143-268

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), (t), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources” throughout the section; and substituted “Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Secretary of Cultural Resources” in subdivision (10).

§ 121-3.
Name.

The archival and historical agency of the State of North Carolina shall be the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources.

History.

1945, c. 55; 1955, c. 543, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources.”

§ 121-4.
Powers and duties of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources.

The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall have the following powers and duties:

To accept gifts, devises, and endowments for purposes which fall within the general legal powers and duties of the Department. Unless otherwise specified by the donor or testator, the Department may either expend both the principal and interest of any gift or devises or may invest such funds in whole or in part, by and with the consent of the State Treasurer. The Department may recognize gifts by naming exhibits, features, or programs administered by the Department.

To conduct a records management program, including the operation of a records center or centers and a centralized microfilming program, for the benefit of all State agencies, and to give advice and assistance to the public officials and agencies in matters pertaining to the economical and efficient maintenance and preservation of public records.

To preserve and administer, in the North Carolina State Archives, such public records as may be accepted into its custody, and to collect, preserve, and administer private and unofficial historical records and other documentary materials relating to the history of North Carolina and the territory included therein from the earliest times. The Department shall carefully protect and preserve such materials, file them according to approved archival practices, and permit them, at reasonable times and under the supervision of the Department, to be inspected, examined, or copied: Provided, that any materials placed in the keeping of the Department under special terms or conditions restricting their use shall be made accessible only in accordance with such terms or conditions.

To have materials on the history of North Carolina properly edited, published as other State printing, and distributed under the direction of the Department. The Department may charge a reasonable price for such publications and devote the revenue arising from such sales to the work of the Department.

With the cooperation of the State Board of Education and the Department of Public Instruction to develop, conduct, and assist in the coordination of a program for the better and more adequate teaching of State and local history in the public schools and the institutions of the community college system of North Carolina, including, as appropriate, the preparation and publication of suitable histories of all counties and of other appropriate materials, the distribution of such materials to the public schools and community college system for a reasonable charge, and the coordination of this program throughout the State.

To maintain and administer the North Carolina Museum of History, to collect and preserve therein important historical and cultural materials, and according to approved museum practices to classify, accession, house, and when feasible exhibit such materials and make them available for study.

To select suitable sites on property owned by the State of North Carolina, or any subdivision of the State, for the erection of historical markers calling attention to nearby historic sites and prepare appropriate inscriptions to be placed on such markers. The Department shall have all markers manufactured, and when completed, each marker shall be delivered to the Department of Transportation for payment and erection under the provisions of G.S. 136-42.2 and 136-42.3. The Secretary is authorized to appoint a highway historical marker advisory committee to approve all proposed highway historical markers and to establish criteria for carrying out this responsibility.

In accordance with

G.S. 121-9

of this Chapter, to acquire real and personal properties that have statewide historical, architectural, archaeological, or other cultural significance, by gift, purchase, or devise; to preserve and administer such properties; and, when necessary, to charge reasonable admission fees to such properties. In the acquisition of such property, the Department shall also have the authority to acquire nearby or adjacent property adjacent to properties having statewide significance deemed necessary for the proper use, administration, and protection of historic, architectural, archaeological, or cultural properties, or for the protection of the environment thereof.

To administer and enforce reasonable rules adopted and promulgated by the Historical Commission for the regulation of the use by the public of such historical, architectural, archaeological, or cultural properties under its charge, which regulations, after having been posted in conspicuous places on and adjacent to such State properties and having been filed according to law, shall have the force and effect of law and any violation of such regulations shall constitute a Class 3 misdemeanor.

To coordinate the objectives of the state-created historical and commemorative commissions with the other policies, objectives, and programs of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources.

To organize and administer a junior historian program, in cooperation with the Department of Public Education, the public schools, and other agencies or organizations that may be concerned therein.

With the approval of the Historical Commission, to dispose of any accessioned records, artifacts, and furnishings in the custody of the Department that are determined to have no further use or value for official or administrative purposes or for research and reference purposes.

To promote and encourage throughout the State knowledge and appreciation of North Carolina history and heritage by encouraging the people of the State to engage in the preservation and care of archives, historical manuscripts, museum items, and other historical materials; the writing and publication of State and local histories of high standard; the display and interpretation of historical materials; the marking and preservation of historic, architectural, or archaeological structures and sites of great importance; the teaching of North Carolina and local history in the schools and colleges; the appropriate observance of events of importance to the State’s history; the publicizing of the State’s history through media of public information; and other activities in historical and allied fields.

With the approval of the Historical Commission, to charge and collect fees not to exceed cost for photographs, photocopies of documents, microfilm and other microforms and other audio or visual reproductions of public records or other documentary materials, objects, artifacts, and research materials; and for the restoration and preservation of documents and other materials important for archival or historical purposes.

To encourage and develop, in cooperation with the Department of Administration and in consultation with the Department of Transportation, the Department of Commerce, the Department of Environmental Quality, the North Carolina League of Municipalities, the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners, and the Historic Preservation Foundation of North Carolina, Inc., a central clearinghouse for information on historic preservation for the benefit and use of public and private agencies and persons in North Carolina.

Repealed by Session Laws 2004-203, s. 51, effective August 17, 2004.

To enter into an agreement with a private nonprofit corporation for the management of facilities to provide food and beverages at the North Carolina Museum of History. Any net proceeds received by the private nonprofit corporation shall be devoted to the work of the Department. Any private nonprofit corporation entering into an agreement with the Department with regard to the management of the facilities may enter into further agreements with private persons or corporations concerning the operation of the facilities. The Department may enter into an agreement in regard to obtaining or installing equipment, furniture, and furnishings for such facilities.

History.

Rev., ss. 4540, 4541; 1907, c. 714, s. 2; 1911, c. 211, s. 6; C.S., s. 6142; 1925, c. 275, s. 11; 1943, c. 237; 1945, c. 55; 1955, c. 543, s. 1; 1957, c. 330, s. 1; 1959, c. 68, s. 1; 1971, c. 345, s. 3; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; 1977, c. 464, s. 38; 1981, c. 721; 1989, c. 379; c. 727, s. 218(83); c. 751, s. 11; 1991, c. 757, s. 5; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 959, s. 30; 1993, c. 522, s. 8; c. 539, s. 915; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2004-203, s. 51; 2011-284, s. 86; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), (u); 2021-158, s. 12.5.

Local Modification.

Town of Lillington: 2002-47, s. 1.

§ 121-4.1.
North Carolina Register of Historic Places.

The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources may establish, expand, and maintain a North Carolina Register of Historic Places composed of districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects significant in North Carolina history, architecture, archaeology, engineering, and culture. Until such time as the North Carolina Register of Historic Places is established, all references to it in the General Statutes and in the rules adopted pursuant to it shall be construed to mean properties and districts in North Carolina that are listed in the National Register of Historic Places.

The North Carolina Historical Commission shall establish criteria for properties to be included in the State Register of Historic Places, and, within such criteria, shall provide for levels of significance as necessary and appropriate.

The North Carolina Historical Commission shall promulgate regulations requiring that before any property or district may be included on the North Carolina Register of Historic Places, the owner or owners of such property, or a majority of the owners of the properties within the district in the case of an historic district, shall be given the opportunity (including a reasonable period of time) to concur in, or object to, the nomination of the property or district for such inclusion or designation. If the owner or owners of any privately owned property, or a majority of the owners of such properties within the district in the case of an historic district, object to such inclusion or designation, such property shall not be included on the North Carolina Register until such objection has been withdrawn. The regulations under this paragraph shall include provisions to carry out the purposes of this paragraph in the case of multiple ownership of a single property.

History.

1989, c. 60; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources” in subsection (a).

§ 121-5.
Public records and archives.

State Archival Agency Designated. — The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall be the official archival agency of the State of North Carolina with authority as provided throughout this Chapter and Chapter 132 of the General Statutes of North Carolina in relation to the public records of the State, counties, municipalities, and other subdivisions of government.

Destruction of Records Regulated. — No person may destroy, sell, loan, or otherwise dispose of any public record without the consent of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, except as provided in

G.S. 130A-99

. Whoever unlawfully removes a public record from the office where it is usually kept, or alters, mutilates, or destroys it shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and upon conviction only fined at the discretion of the court.When the custodian of any official State records certifies to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources that such records have no further use or value for official and administrative purposes and when the Department certifies that such records appear to have no further use or value for research or reference, then such records may be destroyed or otherwise disposed of by the agency having custody of them.When the custodian of any official records of any county, city, municipality, or other subdivision of government certifies to the Department that such records have no further use or value for official business and when the Department certifies that such records appear to have no further use or value for research or reference, then such records may be authorized by the governing body of said county, city, municipality, or other subdivision of government to be destroyed or otherwise disposed of by the agency having custody of them. A record of such certification and authorization shall be entered in the minutes of the governing body granting the authority.The North Carolina Historical Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to make such orders, rules, and regulations as may be necessary and proper to carry into effect the provisions of this section. When any State, county, municipal, or other governmental records shall have been destroyed or otherwise disposed of in accordance with the procedure authorized in this subsection, any liability that the custodian of such records might incur for such destruction or other disposal shall cease and determine.

Assistance to Public Officers. — The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall have the right to examine into the condition of public records and shall, subject to the availability of staff and funds, give advice and assistance to public officials and agencies in regard to preserving or disposing of the public records in their custody. When requested by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, public officials shall assist the Department in the preparation of an inclusive inventory of records in their custody, to which inventory shall be attached a schedule, approved by the head of the governmental unit or agency having custody of the records and the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, establishing a time period for the retention or disposal of each series of records. So long as such approved schedule remains in effect, destruction or disposal of records in accordance with its provisions shall be deemed to have met the requirements of

G.S. 121-5(b)

.The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources is hereby authorized and directed to conduct a program of inventorying, repairing, and microfilming in the counties for security purposes those official records of the several counties which the Department determines have permanent value, and of providing safe storage for microfilm copies of such records. Subject to the availability of funds, such program shall be extended to the records of permanent value of the cities, municipalities, and other subdivisions of government.

Preservation of Permanently Valuable Records. — Public records certified by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources as being of permanent value shall be preserved in the custody of the agency in which the records are normally kept or of the North Carolina State Archives. Any State, county, municipal, or other public official is hereby authorized and empowered to turn over to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources any State, county, municipal, or other public records no longer in current official use, and the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources is authorized in its discretion to accept such records, and having done so shall provide for their administration and preservation in the North Carolina State Archives. When such records have been thus surrendered, photocopies, microfilms, typescripts, or other copies of them shall be made and certified under seal of the Department, upon application of any person, which certification shall have the same force and effect as if made by the official or agency by which the records were transferred to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources; and the Department may charge reasonable fees for these copies. The Department may answer written inquiries for nonresidents of the State and for this service may charge a search and handling fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00). The receipts from this fee shall be used to defray the cost of providing this service.

Archives and Records Management Fund. — The Archives and Records Management Fund is established as a special revenue fund. The Fund consists of donations, gifts, devises, and the fees credited to it under Chapter 161 of the General Statutes. Revenue in the Fund may be used only to offset the Department’s costs in providing essential records management and archival services for public records pursuant to Chapter 121 and Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

History.

1907, c. 714, s. 5; C.S., s. 6145; 1939, c. 249; 1943, c. 237; 1945, c. 55; 1953, c. 224; 1955, c. 543, s. 1; 1959, c. 1162; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; 1979, c. 361; c. 801, s. 95; 1981, c. 406, ss. 1, 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 916; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-309, s. 13; 2001-427, s. 3(a); 2009-451, s. 20B.3(b); 2012-79, s. 2.19(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(s); 2017-57, s. 14.3(a).

Cross References.

As to larceny of records or papers in the custody of the North Carolina State Archives, see

G.S. 14-72

.

As to mutilation or defacement of records and papers in the North Carolina State Archives, see

G.S. 14-76.1

.

As to expunction of records, see

G.S. 15A-145

, 15A-146.

As to destruction of public records, including revenue records and records of the Division of Employment Security (DES) of the Department of Commerce, see

G.S. 132-3

.

§ 121-5.1.
State Historical Records Advisory Board.

The State Historical Records Advisory Board, which was constituted in 1975 in accordance with 44 U.S.C. § 2501; 36 C.F.R. § 1206 is continued under State law and shall be located administratively in the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. The Board shall consist of 10 members. Eight members shall be appointed by the Governor for three-year staggered terms, and each member shall have experience in the administration and use of historical records. All current members shall continue to serve until the expiration of their term unless a member is removed or the position becomes vacant, in which case the vacancy shall be filled in accordance with subsection (c) of this section. The Deputy Secretary of the Office of Archives and History and the State Archivist shall both serve as ex officio members of the Board.

The Board’s primary duty shall be to serve as the central advisory body for historical records coordination within the State and for the National Historical Publications and Records Commission (NHPRC). In addition, subject to the availability of funds, the Board shall:

Offer assistance, advice, and consultation to State, county, and municipal governments, historic sites, museums, historical societies, and other institutions holding records of historical value concerning the care, preservation, and management of their records.

Solicit, review, and assess grant proposals in connection with NHPRC grants or grants from other sources.

Offer educational programs and conferences.

Conduct statewide studies and surveys of the State’s historical records.

The Governor may remove any member for good cause shown. The Governor shall fill any vacancy on the Board. Appointees to fill vacancies shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term and until their successors have been appointed and qualified.

Members of the Board shall receive per diem and reimbursement for travel and subsistence as provided in

G.S. 138-5

and

G.S. 138-6

, as appropriate.

The Governor shall appoint either the Deputy Secretary of the Office of Archives and History or the State Archivist as the State coordinator as required by NHPRC regulations. The State coordinator shall serve a four-year term and may be reappointed. The State coordinator may designate a deputy State coordinator from the Board’s membership.

The Board shall hold at least two meetings each year to conduct business. The Board shall establish the procedures for calling, holding, and conducting regular and special meetings. A majority of the members of the Board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

History.

2007-150, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources” in subsection (a).

§ 121-6.
Historical publications.

General Provisions. — It shall be the duty of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources to promote and encourage the writing of North Carolina history and to collect, edit, publish, print, and distribute books, pamphlets, papers, manuscripts, documents, maps, and other materials relating to North Carolina archives and history. The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources may establish a reasonable charge for such publications and devote the revenue arising therefrom to such additional publication of materials relating to North Carolina archives and history as may be undertaken by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. Except for reports, bulletins, and other publications issued for free distribution, professional materials including books and journals published by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources are hereby expressly excluded from provisions of

G.S. 147-50

.

Editing and Publishing of Official Messages and Other Papers of Governor. — During the term of office of each Governor of this State, a copy of all official messages delivered to the General Assembly, addresses, speeches, statements, news releases, proclamations, executive orders, weekly calendars, articles, transcripts of news conferences, lists of appointments, and other official releases and papers of the Governor shall be kept in the Governor’s office for delivery to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources at the end of each quarter during the Governor’s administration. These papers shall be compiled and a selection made therefrom by a skilled and competent editor. The editor shall edit, according to acceptable scholarly standards, the selected materials which shall be published in a documentary volume as soon as practicable after the conclusion of the term of office of each Governor. If, for any reason, a Governor serves less than a full term, a documentary volume shall be edited and published for such portion of a term as he shall have served. If a Governor serves more than one term, a documentary volume shall be edited and published for each term served. Funds for editorial assistance, printing, binding, and distribution shall be paid from the Contingency and Emergency Fund. The number of copies of each volume to be printed shall be determined by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources in consultation with the Governor whose papers are being published.

It shall be the duty and the responsibility for the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources to edit and publish a second or new series of the most significant records of colonial North Carolina. From records which have been compiled in the North Carolina State Archives concerning the colonial period of North Carolina, a selection of the most significant documents shall be made therefrom by a skilled and competent editor. The editor shall edit, according to acceptable scholarly standards, the selected materials which shall be published in documentary volumes not to exceed approximately 700 pages each in length until full and representative published colonial records of North Carolina shall have been achieved. The number of copies of each volume to be so printed shall be determined by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, and such determination shall be based on the number of copies the Department can reasonably expect to sell in a period of 10 years from the date of publication. In any year during which the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources has completed a volume and has it ready for publication, the Department may include in its base budget for that year sufficient funds to pay the estimated costs of publishing the volume. In the event that the volume is not published during that year, the appropriation made, or any unencumbered balance, shall revert to the general fund.

History.

1971, c. 480, s. 6; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; 1979, c. 1010; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1290; 2014-100, s. 6.4(g); 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 6.4(g), effective July 1, 2014, substituted “base budget” for “continuation budget” in the fifth sentence of subsection (c). See Editor’s note for applicability.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources” throughout the section.

§ 121-7.
Historical museums.

The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall maintain and administer State historic sites and museums under the management of the Office of Archives and History for the collection, preservation, study, and exhibition of authentic artifacts and other historical materials relating to the history and heritage of North Carolina. The Department, with the approval of the Historical Commission, may acquire, either by purchase, gift, or loan such artifacts and materials, and, having acquired them, shall according to accepted museum practices classify, accession, preserve, and where feasible exhibit such materials and make them available for study. Within available funds, one or more branch museums of history or specialized regional history museums may be established and administered by the Department. The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, subject to the availability of staff and funds, may give financial, technical, and professional assistance to nonstate historical museums sponsored by governmental agencies and nonprofit organizations according to regulations adopted by the North Carolina Historical Commission.The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources may, with the explicit approval of the North Carolina Historical Commission sell, trade, or place on loan any artifact owned by the State of North Carolina and in the custody of and curated by the Office of Archives and History, unless the sale, trade, or loan would be contrary to the terms of acquisition. The net proceeds of any sale, after deduction of the expenses attributable to that sale, shall be deposited in the Office of Archives and History Artifact Fund to the credit of the museum or archives that had custody of the artifact sold and shall be used only for the expenses associated with the purchase, maintenance, or conservation of other artifacts. No artifact curated by any agency of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources may be pledged or mortgaged.

Insofar as practicable, the Office of Archives and History shall accession and maintain records showing provenance, value, location, and other pertinent information on such furniture, furnishings, decorative items, and other objects as have historical or cultural importance and which are owned by or to be acquired by the State for use in the State Capitol and the Executive Mansion, and, upon request of the Department of Administration, any other state-owned building. When any such item or object has been entered in the accession records of the Office of Archives and History, the custodian of such item or object shall, upon its removal from the premises upon which it was located or when it is otherwise disposed of, submit to the Office of Archives and History sufficient details concerning its removal or disposition to permit an adequate entry in the accession records to the end that its location or disposition, and authority for such change, shall be shown therein.

, (d) Repealed by Session Laws 2015-218, s. 1, effective August 18, 2015.

History.

1973, c. 476, s. 48; 1979, c. 861, s. 1; 1987, c. 721, s. 1; 1991, c. 689, s. 191(a); c. 757, s. 6; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 12.3; 1997-411, s. 4; 2002-159, s. 35(g); 2015-218, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-218, s. 1, effective August 18, 2015, substituted “sites and museums” for “attractions” near the middle of the first sentence of the first paragraph of subsection (a); deleted “permanent” preceding “loan any artifact” near the middle of the first sentence of the second paragraph in subsection (a); rewrote the second sentence of the second paragraph of subsection (a); and deleted former subsections (c) and (d).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources” throughout the section.

§ 121-7.1.
Maritime Museum; disposition of artifacts.

Notwithstanding Article 3A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, G.S. 143-49(4), or any other law pertaining to surplus State property, the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, with the approval of the North Carolina Historical Commission, may sell, trade, or place on permanent loan any artifact from the collection of the North Carolina Maritime Museum unless the sale, trade, or loan would be contrary to the terms of the acquisition. Sales or exchanges shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted practices for accredited museums. If an artifact is sold, the net proceeds of the sale shall be deposited in the State treasury to the credit of a special fund to be used for the improvement of the Museum’s collections or exhibits.

History.

1998-212, s. 21(b); 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

§ 121-7.2.
Maritime Museum; branch museum.

The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall assume from the Southport Maritime Museum, Inc., the administration of the Southport Maritime Museum in Brunswick County and shall operate it as a branch of the North Carolina Maritime Museum.

History.

1999-237, s. 26.1(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

§ 121-7.3.
Admission and related activity fees and operating hours.

The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources may charge a reasonable admission and related activity fee to the Roanoke Island Festival Park and any historic site or museum administered by the Department. Admission and related activity fees collected under this section are receipts of the Department and shall be deposited in the appropriate special fund. The revenue collected pursuant to this section shall be used only for the individual site or venue where the receipts were generated. The Secretary may adopt rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The Department is exempt from the requirements of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes and

G.S. 12-3.1

when adopting, amending, or repealing rules for operating hours and admission fees or related activity fees at the Roanoke Island Festival Park, historic sites, and museums.

History.

2003-284, s. 35A.4; 2013-297, s. 2(a); 2013-360, s. 19.2(a); 2014-100, s. 19.5(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(s); 2017-57, ss. 14.1(cc), 14.8(d); 2020-78, s. 8.2(b).

§ 121-7.4.
Graveyard of the Atlantic Museum.

The Department of
Natural and Cultural Resources shall assume from the Graveyard of the Atlantic Museum, the administration of the Graveyard of the Atlantic Museum on Hatteras Island and shall designate it as a member of the State History Museums Division, in accordance with the feasibility study conducted by the Department.

History.

2007-359, s. 1(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

§ 121-7.5.
Bentonville Battlefield Fund.

Fund. — The Bentonville Battlefield Fund is created as a special, interest-bearing, and nonreverting fund in the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, Division of State Historic Sites. The Fund shall be treated as a special trust fund and shall be used for operation, interpretation, maintenance, preservation, development, and expansion at Bentonville Battlefield State Historic Site.

Fund Sources. — Notwithstanding Chapter 146 of the General Statutes, the Fund consists of (i) all revenue derived from donations, gifts, devises, grants, admissions, and fees collected for the benefit of the Bentonville Battlefield State Historic Site, (ii) the net proceeds derived from the sale of real property pursuant to G.S. 146-30(d)(13), and (iii) interest on funds in the Fund credited by the State Treasurer pursuant to

G.S. 147-69.2

and

G.S. 147-69.3

.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 14.1(d), effective July 1, 2021.

Report. — The Division of State Historic Sites shall submit to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the Fiscal Research Division by September 30 of each year a report on the Bentonville Battlefield Fund that shall include the source and amount of all funds credited to the Fund and the purpose and amount of all expenditures from the Fund during the prior fiscal year.

History.

2008-107, s. 19A.1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s); 2021-180, s. 14.1(d).

§ 121-7.6.
North Carolina Transportation Museum special fund.

Fund Established. — The North Carolina Transportation Museum Fund is created as a special, interest-bearing, nonreverting enterprise fund in the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. The Fund shall be treated as a special trust fund and shall be used to pay all costs associated with the operation, interpretation, development, expansion, preservation, and maintenance of the North Carolina Transportation Museum.

Fund Sources. — Notwithstanding Chapter 146 of the General Statutes, the Fund consists of (i) all revenue derived from donations, gifts, devises, grants, admissions, and fees collected by or for the benefit of the North Carolina Transportation Museum Fund, (ii) the net proceeds derived from the sale of real property pursuant to G.S. 146-30(d)(14), and (iii) interest on funds in the Fund credited by the State Treasurer pursuant to

G.S. 147-69.2

and

G.S. 147-69.3

.

Emergency Reserve. — The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall establish, out of existing unobligated funds including lapsed salaries and unobligated special funds, an emergency reserve fund in the amount of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000). Any use of the emergency reserve will require reimbursement from museum receipts.

Audit. — The Fund shall be subject to the oversight of the State Auditor pursuant to Article 5A of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes. The Fund shall reimburse the State Auditor for the cost of any audit.

Report. — The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall submit to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the Fiscal Research Division by September 30 of each year a report on the North Carolina Transportation Museum Fund that shall include the source and amount of all funds credited to the Fund and the purpose and amount of all expenditures from the Fund during the prior fiscal year.

History.

2011-145, s. 21.1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s); 2017-57, s. 14.3(b); 2021-180, s. 14.1(e).